Massachusetts, session 194th, H2276.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The second paragraph of section 3 of chapter 40A of the General Laws, as
appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word
“requirements”, in lines 60 and 61, the following words:- ; provided, further, that no such land or
structures located in a low income city or town, defined for purposes of this paragraph as a city
or town whose average median income is equal to 60 per cent or less of the average median
income of the commonwealth, shall be used for educational purposes pursuant to this section,
including, but not limited to the purpose of opening a substance abuse or alcohol rehabilitation
center or a clinic, nor be exempt from zoning regulation pursuant to this section, without first
obtaining the approval of the legislative body of such city or town.
SECTION 2. Said section 3 of said chapter 40A, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by adding the following paragraph:-
of 2

Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, any person, organization,
institution or corporation that purchases property within a city or town to be used for educational
purposes pursuant to this section, and who fails, within 2 years to substantially improve such
property shall be assessed at the property's highest and best use at commercial rate for such
property, with no exemption.
of 2